dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- মৌখিক; মৌখিক -->
    <pardef n="মৌখিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সক্রিয়তর; সক্রিয় -->
    <pardef n="সক্রিয়/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তীব্রতর; তীব্র -->
    <pardef n="তীব্র/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জনবহুল; জনবহুল -->
    <pardef n="জনবহুল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাধারণ; সাধারণ -->
    <pardef n="সাধারণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সত্যি; সত্যি -->
    <pardef n="সত্যি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তীব্রতম; তীব্র -->
    <pardef n="তীব্র/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সক্রিয়তম; সক্রিয় -->
    <pardef n="সক্রিয়/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- হাস্যকর; হাস্যকর -->
    <pardef n="হাস্যকর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ত্রিমাত্রিক; ত্রিমাত্রিক -->
    <pardef n="ত্রিমাত্রিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রদত্ত; প্রদত্ত -->
    <pardef n="প্রদত্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্পূর্ণ; সম্পূর্ণ -->
    <pardef n="সম্পূর্ণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বৈদ্যুতিক; বৈদ্যুতিক -->
    <pardef n="বৈদ্যুতিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বঞ্চিততম; বঞ্চিত -->
    <pardef n="বঞ্চিত/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কম; কম -->
    <pardef n="কম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অল্প; অল্প -->
    <pardef n="অল্প__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অন্তত; অন্তত -->
    <pardef n="অন্তত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভাগ্যবান; ভাগ্যবান -->
    <pardef n="ভাগ্যবান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- টক; টক -->
    <pardef n="টক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ধাতব; ধাতব -->
    <pardef n="ধাতব__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বেচ্ছাসেবী; স্বেচ্ছাসেবী -->
    <pardef n="স্বেচ্ছাসেবী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনুমোদিত; অনুমোদিত -->
    <pardef n="অনুমোদিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চীনা; চীনা -->
    <pardef n="চীনা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঢেউ; ঢেউ -->
    <pardef n="ঢেউ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বঞ্চিততর; বঞ্চিত -->
    <pardef n="বঞ্চিত/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিরল; বিরল -->
    <pardef n="বিরল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আইনি; আইনি -->
    <pardef n="আইনি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গঠিত; গঠিত -->
    <pardef n="গঠিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রাথমিক; প্রাথমিক -->
    <pardef n="প্রাথমিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মেধাবী; মেধাবী -->
    <pardef n="মেধাবী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ৪র্থ; ৪র্থ -->
    <pardef n="৪র্থ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সন্দেহজনক; সন্দেহজনক -->
    <pardef n="সন্দেহজনক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- খাদ্য; খাদ্য -->
    <pardef n="খাদ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সক্ষম; সক্ষম -->
    <pardef n="সক্ষম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ব্রিটিশ; ব্রিটিশ -->
    <pardef n="ব্রিটিশ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অসাধু; অসাধু -->
    <pardef n="অসাধু__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ব্যর্থ; ব্যর্থ -->
    <pardef n="ব্যর্থ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পাকা; পাকা -->
    <pardef n="পাকা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চলন্ত; চলন্ত -->
    <pardef n="চলন্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্থানান্তরিত; স্থানান্তরিত -->
    <pardef n="স্থানান্তরিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পুরুষ; পুরুষ -->
    <pardef n="পুরুষ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমগ্র; সমগ্র -->
    <pardef n="সমগ্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ব্যতিক্রমী; ব্যতিক্রমী -->
    <pardef n="ব্যতিক্রমী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সচেতন; সচেতন -->
    <pardef n="সচেতন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="মৌখিক"><i>মৌখিক</i><par n="মৌখিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সক্রিয়তর"><i>সক্রিয়</i><par n="সক্রিয়/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তীব্রতর"><i>তীব্র</i><par n="তীব্র/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জনবহুল"><i>জনবহুল</i><par n="জনবহুল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাধারণ"><i>সাধারণ</i><par n="সাধারণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সত্যি"><i>সত্যি</i><par n="সত্যি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তীব্রতম"><i>তীব্র</i><par n="তীব্র/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সক্রিয়তম"><i>সক্রিয়</i><par n="সক্রিয়/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="হাস্যকর"><i>হাস্যকর</i><par n="হাস্যকর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ত্রিমাত্রিক"><i>ত্রিমাত্রিক</i><par n="ত্রিমাত্রিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রদত্ত"><i>প্রদত্ত</i><par n="প্রদত্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্পূর্ণ"><i>সম্পূর্ণ</i><par n="সম্পূর্ণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বৈদ্যুতিক"><i>বৈদ্যুতিক</i><par n="বৈদ্যুতিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বঞ্চিততম"><i>বঞ্চিত</i><par n="বঞ্চিত/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কম"><i>কম</i><par n="কম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অল্প"><i>অল্প</i><par n="অল্প__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্তত"><i>অন্তত</i><par n="অন্তত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাগ্যবান"><i>ভাগ্যবান</i><par n="ভাগ্যবান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="টক"><i>টক</i><par n="টক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ধাতব"><i>ধাতব</i><par n="ধাতব__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বেচ্ছাসেবী"><i>স্বেচ্ছাসেবী</i><par n="স্বেচ্ছাসেবী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুমোদিত"><i>অনুমোদিত</i><par n="অনুমোদিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চীনা"><i>চীনা</i><par n="চীনা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঢেউ"><i>ঢেউ</i><par n="ঢেউ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বঞ্চিততর"><i>বঞ্চিত</i><par n="বঞ্চিত/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরল"><i>বিরল</i><par n="বিরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আইনি"><i>আইনি</i><par n="আইনি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গঠিত"><i>গঠিত</i><par n="গঠিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাথমিক"><i>প্রাথমিক</i><par n="প্রাথমিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মেধাবী"><i>মেধাবী</i><par n="মেধাবী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="৪র্থ"><i>৪র্থ</i><par n="৪র্থ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সন্দেহজনক"><i>সন্দেহজনক</i><par n="সন্দেহজনক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="খাদ্য"><i>খাদ্য</i><par n="খাদ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সক্ষম"><i>সক্ষম</i><par n="সক্ষম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্রিটিশ"><i>ব্রিটিশ</i><par n="ব্রিটিশ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অসাধু"><i>অসাধু</i><par n="অসাধু__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যর্থ"><i>ব্যর্থ</i><par n="ব্যর্থ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পাকা"><i>পাকা</i><par n="পাকা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চলন্ত"><i>চলন্ত</i><par n="চলন্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্থানান্তরিত"><i>স্থানান্তরিত</i><par n="স্থানান্তরিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পুরুষ"><i>পুরুষ</i><par n="পুরুষ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমগ্র"><i>সমগ্র</i><par n="সমগ্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যতিক্রমী"><i>ব্যতিক্রমী</i><par n="ব্যতিক্রমী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সচেতন"><i>সচেতন</i><par n="সচেতন__adj"/></e>
